Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 2. Action on Threatened Crime; Requirements of Undertakings.

Sec. 12.60.040.
Action on threatened crime.

A person may bring a complaint in the district court against a person who has threatened to commit a crime against the person or property of another.

History.

(§ 9.04 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966)

Sec. 12.60.050.
Examination of complainant and witnesses.

When the complaint is brought, the judge or magistrate shall examine the complainant and require the complainant to sign the complaint under oath, and take signed statements under oath of any witnesses the complainant produces.

History.

(§ 9.05 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 18 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.60.060.
Arrest.

If it appears that there is good reason to fear the commission of the crime threatened by the person complained of, the judge or magistrate shall have the person complained of arrested and immediately brought before the judge or magistrate.

History.

(§ 9.06 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 19 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.60.070.
Examination of charge.

When the person complained of appears or is brought before the judge or magistrate, if the charge in the complaint is controverted, the judge or magistrate may subpoena witnesses, hear any statement to the charges made by the person complained of, and hear all other testimony.

History.

(§ 9.07 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 20 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.60.080.
Adjournment of examination.

The judge or magistrate may adjourn the examination and commit the person complained of, or take bail or a deposit of money in lieu thereof.

History.

(§ 9.08 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 21 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.60.090.
Discharge for lack of grounds.

If it appears that there is no good reason to fear the commission of the crime alleged to have been threatened, the person complained of shall be discharged.

History.

(§ 9.09 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.60.100.
Requirement of undertaking.

If there is good reason to fear the commission of the crime, the person complained of may be required to enter into an undertaking in a sum not exceeding $2,000 as the judge or magistrate may direct, with one or more sufficient sureties, to keep the peace toward the people of the state and particularly toward the complainant.
The undertaking is valid and binding for not more than one year and may, upon the renewal of the action, be extended for an additional period of not more than one year, or a new undertaking required.

History.

(§ 9.10 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 22 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.60.110.
Discharge upon giving undertaking.

If the undertaking is given, the party complained of shall be discharged.
If the party complained of does not give the undertaking, the judge or magistrate shall commit the party to the custody of a peace officer.

History.

(§ 9.11 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 23 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.60.120.
Security where crime committed or threatened before court, judge or magistrate.

A person who, in the presence of a court, judge, or magistrate, assaults or threatens to assault another, or to commit an offense against another’s property, or who contends with another with angry words to the disturbance of the peace may be ordered by the court, judge, or magistrate without warrant or other proof to give security as provided in this chapter and, if the person omits to do so, may be committed.

History.

(§ 9.12 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 24 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.60.130.
Discharge upon giving undertaking after commitment.

If the person complained of is committed for not giving the undertaking required, the person may be discharged by any judge or magistrate upon giving the undertaking.

History.

(§ 9.13 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 25 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.60.140.
Forfeiture of undertaking.

The undertaking is forfeited upon the person complained of being convicted of a breach of the peace.

History.

(§ 9.14 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.60.150.
Rights and authorities of sureties.

The sureties in an undertaking to keep the peace are entitled to the rights and authority of bail under AS 12.30 and the Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, and may be exonerated from their undertaking in the manner prescribed by law.

History.

(§ 9.15 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 4 ch 21 SLA 1985)

Sec. 12.60.160.
Requiring security of convicted person.

The court before whom any person is convicted of a crime which, by the judgment of the court, is punished otherwise than by imprisonment in the penitentiary may require that person to enter into an undertaking as provided in AS

12.60.100

for not more than two years. If the person does not provide the undertaking, the court may commit the person until the undertaking is given or the period expires.

History.

(§ 9.16 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.60.170.
Security to keep the peace.

An undertaking to keep the peace shall also be considered an undertaking to be of good behavior, and cannot be required except as prescribed in this chapter.

History.

(§ 9.17 ch 34 SLA 1962)